Connecticut, session 2026, SB00420.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subdivision (5) of subsection (a) of section 16-1 of the 2026
2 supplement to the general statutes is repealed and the following is
3 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (5) "Gas company" includes every person owning, leasing,
5 maintaining, operating, managing or controlling mains, pipes or other
6 fixtures, in public highways or streets, for the transmission or
7 distribution of gas for sale and to be used for heat or power within [this]
8 the state, or engaged in the manufacture of gas to be so transmitted or
9 distributed for such purpose. [, but shall] "Gas company" does not
10 include (A) a person manufacturing gas through the use of a biomass
11 gasification plant, provided such person does not own, lease, maintain,
12 operate, manage or control mains, pipes or other fixtures in public
13 highways or streets, (B) a municipal gas utility established under
14 chapter 101 or any other gas utility owned, leased, maintained,
15 operated, managed or controlled by any unit of local government under
SB420 / File No. 470 1

SB420 File No. 470
16 any general statute or any public or special act, or (C) an entity approved
17 to submeter pursuant to section 16-19ff;
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 16-1(a)(5)
ET Joint Favorable
SB420 / File No. 470 2

SB420 File No. 470
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill makes various technical changes to energy related statutes
and has no fiscal impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB420 / File No. 470 3

SB420 File No. 470
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 420
AN ACT CONCERNING NATURAL GAS AND GAS COMPANIES.